Washington statutes.
RCW 8.04.097

Acquisition when several ownerships.

Whenever it becomes necessary on behalf of the state to acquire by condemnation more than one tract of land, property, or property rights, existing in any one county, and held in different ownerships or interests, the state may consolidate and file a single petition as one action against the several tracts of land, property, or property rights held by said different ownerships or interests, setting forth separately the descriptions of the tracts of land, property, or property rights needed, and the owners, persons, or parties interested therein.

[ 1955 c 156 s 1. Formerly RCW 8.04.190.]